cs: Hodnocení třídy spolehlivosti suchého zipu: Extra vysoká zátěž / průmyslový; Vysoká zátěž; Nízká zátěž; Standardní; Jiný
fi: Tarranauhakiinnityksen kestävyysluokitus: Erittäin kestävä / teollinen; Kestävä; Kevyt; Vakio; Muu
zh-TW: 魔鬼氈扣件耐用等級: 特重型/工業用; 重型; 輕型; 標準型; 其他
pt-BR: Fecho de contato classificação de resistência: Extra resistente/industrial; Resistente; Uso leve; Padrão; Outros
fr: Classe d’usage de la fermeture autoagrippante: Qualité extra-robuste/industrielle; Qualité robuste; Qualité légère; Standard; Autre
nb: Borrelås-tollplitter-vurdering: Ekstra kraftig/industriell; Kraftig; Lett; Standard; Annet
pt-PT: Fecho de velcro classificação: Extrarresistente/industrial; Resistente; Uso ligeiro; Padrão; Outro
ja: フックとループファスナー耐荷重: 超高耐久/工業用; 高耐久; 軽耐久; 標準; その他
nl: Klittenbandsluiting belastbaarheidsklasse: Extra zwaar/industrieel; Zwaar; Licht; Standaard; Overig
pl: Klasa wytrzymałości rzepu: Wzmocnione / przemysłowe; O dużej wytrzymałości; O małej wytrzymałości; Standardowe; Inna
da: Belastningsklasse for burrelukning: Ekstra kraftig/industriel; Kraftig; Let; Standard; Andet
hr-HR: Nazivna nosivost čičak zatvarača: Izrazito za teške uvjete / industrijsko; Za teške uvjete; Za lake uvjete; Standardno; Ostalo
ru: Класс нагрузки текстильной застежки: Сверхпрочный/промышленный; Усиленный; Легкий; Стандартный; Другое
ko: 벨크로 잠금장치 관세 등급: 초고강도/산업용; 고강도; 저강도; 표준; 기타
es: Clasificación de resistencia de los sujetadores de velcro: Resistencia extrafuerte/industrial; Alta resistencia; Baja resistencia; Estándar; Otro
bg-BG: Клас на натоварване на велкро закопчалката: Изключително издръжливи/индустриални; Издръжливи; Леки; Стандартни; Друго
tr: Cırt cırtlı bağlantı kullanım sınıfı: Ekstra ağır hizmet/endüstriyel; Ağır hizmet; Hafif hizmet; Standart; Diğer
ro-RO: Gradul de rezistență al sistemului de prindere cu arici: Extra rezistent / industrial; Rezistent; Pentru sarcini ușoare; Standard; Altele
hu: A tépőzáras rögzítések terhelhetősége: Különösen teherbíró/ipari; Nagy teherbírású; Kis teherbírású; Normál; Egyéb
en: Hook and loop fastener duty rating: Extra heavy-duty/industrial; Heavy-duty; Light-duty; Standard; Other
sk-SK: Odolnosť suchého zipsu: Extra odolný/priemyselný; Vysoko odolný; Pre nízku záťaž; Štandardný; Iné
el: Κατηγορία αντοχής αυτοκόλλητης ταινίας: Εξαιρετικά βαρέως τύπου/βιομηχανικό; Βαρέως τύπου; Ελαφρού τύπου; Τυπικό; Άλλο
th: ระดับการใช้งานของตัวยึดแบบตีนตุ๊กแก: ใช้งานหนักพิเศษ/อุตสาหกรรม; ใช้งานหนัก; ใช้งานเบา; มาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ
de: Belastungsklasse des Klettverschlusses: Extra strapazierfähig/Industrie; Strapazierfähig; Leicht belastbar; Standard; Andere
it: Livello di resistenza della chiusura a strappo: Extra resistente/industriale; Molto resistente; Leggero; Standard; Altro
sl-SI: Razred obremenitve sprijemalnega traku (ježka): Ekstra močna/industrijska; Močna; Za lahko obremenitev; Standardna; Drugo
vi: Độ bền của khóa dán: Siêu bền/Công nghiệp; Độ bền cao; Độ bền nhẹ; Tiêu chuẩn; Khác
zh-CN: 钩环扣件耐用等级: 超重型/工业级; 重型; 轻型; 标准; 其他
sv: Hållfasthetsklass för kardborreband: Extra kraftig/industriell; Kraftig; Lätt; Standard; Annat
lt-LT: Lipnios juostos apkrovos klasė: Ypač tvirta / pramoninė; Tvirta; Lengva; Standartinė; Kita